Utah statutes.
75-5b-104.   Communication between courts.
(1)  A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state
concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter.  The court may allow the
parties to participate in the communication.  Except as otherwise provided in
Subsection (2), the court shall make a record of the communication.  The
record may be limited to the fact that the communication occurred.
(2)  Courts may communicate concerning schedules, calendars, court records,
and other administrative matters without making a record.
